Tennessee, session 114, SB1292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-1-1709, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), there shall be no crime, penalty, or dismissal
from employment for any officer or employee of the state or any other officer or
employee described in § 67-1-1702(a), who in good faith acted in accordance with § 67-
4-2122(a)(8).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1292
000173
- 1 -